Hawaii statutes.
§449-8.6 Sale or transfer of license or
change in control. (a) No escrow depository license shall be transferred except as provided in this section.

(b) A bona fide sale of all or substantially
all of the ongoing operations of a licensee shall not result in the assignment
or transfer of the escrow depository license, until approved by the
commissioner as provided in this section. The proposed purchaser of all or
substantially all of the ongoing operations of a licensee shall file an
application for approval of a proposed change in control of the licensee,
accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee in accordance with this chapter,
and shall not act as an escrow depository until the application has been
approved by the commissioner.

(c) Any transfer of a licensee's voting stock
which may result in the acquisition of control of the licensee may be
considered a transfer of license under this chapter, and prior to the transfer
shall be reported to the commissioner in writing. Upon determination by the
commissioner that the intended transfer will result in the acquisition of
control, the proposed purchaser or transferee of the stock shall file an
application for approval of a proposed change in control of the licensee,
accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee in accordance with this chapter,
and shall not act as an escrow depository until the application has been
approved by the commissioner.

(d) At the
time of filing an application for approval of a proposed change in control of
the licensee, the proposed purchaser or transferee shall provide to the
commissioner the history of its material litigation and criminal convictions
for the five-year period prior to the date of the application, and any other
information requested by the commissioner which may include information similar
to that required of an applicant for initial licensure or license renewal under
this chapter. The proposed purchaser or transferee shall also provide any
authorizations necessary for the commissioner to conduct criminal history
record checks of each of the purchaser or transferee's controlling persons, and
each of the officers, directors, and principals who will be in charge of the
licensee's activities upon approval of the proposed application for change in
control. The authorizations shall be accompanied by the appropriate payment of
the applicable fee for each record check.

(e) Approval of the application for change in
control of the licensee shall be granted only if the commissioner finds that
following the change in control of the licensee, the character, financial
responsibility, experience, ability, and general fitness of the controlling
persons of the applicant for proposed change in control of the licensee, and
each of the officers, directors, and principals who will be in charge of the
licensee's activities upon approval of the proposed application for change in
control, are such as to command the confidence of the community in the State
and to warrant the beliefs that such persons are competent to successfully control
and manage an escrow business and the applicant will be an honest and efficient
escrow depository.

(f) In granting approval, the commissioner may
impose such conditions and restrictions as shall be in the public interest,
including without limitation requiring the proposed purchaser or transferee to
fulfill representations contained in its application for approval of a proposed
change in control of the licensee, and agreements made during the application
process. [L 1992, c 205, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 166, §6; am L 2016, c 224, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next